Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1721XS (4) 91 lh/ko S.F. 508 Section 1. Section 135C.35C, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 135C.35C Nursing facilities ââ joint training sessions. 3 1. The department shall semiannually provide joint training 4 sessions for inspectors and nursing facilities to review at 5 least three of the ten most frequently issued federal citations 6 in the state during the immediately preceding calendar year. 7 The department shall develop a protocol to identify regional 8 citation patterns relating to complaints, standards, and 9 outcomes in the nursing facility inspection process. The 10 department shall include the state long-term care ombudsman, 11 or the state long-term care ombudsmanâs designee, and 12 representatives of each nursing facility provider association 13 in the state in the planning process for the joint training 14 sessions. 15 2. The department shall provide at least one joint training 16 session for inspectors and nursing facilities that provides 17 information and background relating to the settlement agreement 18 approved by the court in Jimmo v. Sebelius , No. 5:11-CV-17 19 (D. Vt.), on January 1, 2013, including that the settlement 20 agreement clarifies the policy of the federal centers for 21 Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States department 22 of health and human services that coverage of skilled nursing 23 and skilled therapy services in a skilled nursing facility, a 24 home health setting, and an outpatient therapy setting does not 25 turn on a beneficiaryâs potential for improvement, but rather 26 on the beneficiaryâs need for skilled care. 27